Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 2, section 2, is amended to read: Sec. 2. MINNESOTA STATE COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES $ 1,347,000 To the board of trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities to design the renovation of space for Career and Technical Education programs new text begin and to replace a portion of the roof new text end at the Heintz Center at Rochester Community and Technical College. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end